src/morphology/stems/acronyms.lexc
LEXICON LETTERNUMBER
2-C ACRO_cons ;
3-A ACRO_cons ;
4-A ACRO_cons ;
4/OPYC:4%/OPYC ACRO_cons ;
5-G ACRO_cons ;
6-B ACRO_cons ;
A/L ACRO_cons ;
A/S ACRO_cons ;
A3 ACRO_cons ;
A4 ACRO_cons ;
A5 ACRO_cons ;
Bb ACRO_cons ;
CSM_1:CSM%_1 ACRO_cons ;
D/S ACRO_cons ;
E6 ACRO_cons ;
ECHAM/OPYC3 ACRO_cons ;
Jk1 ACRO_cons ;
jo1 ACRO_cons ;
jo2 ACRO_cons ;
jo3 ACRO_cons ;
K/S ACRO_cons ;
km/d ACRO_cons ;
km/h ACRO_cons ;
km/t ACRO_cons ;
L-97 ACRO_cons ;
L/L ACRO_cons ;
L97S ACRO_cons ;
LA21 ACRO_cons ;
LU1 ACRO_cons ;
LU2 ACRO_cons ;
NRK1 ACRO_cons ;
NRK2 ACRO_cons ;
NRK3 ACRO_cons ;
O-97 ACRO_cons ;
O97S ACRO_cons ;
P-1 ACRO_cons ;
P-2 ACRO_cons ;
P-3 ACRO_cons ;
P-4 ACRO_cons ;
P1 ACRO_cons ;
P2 ACRO_cons ;
P3 ACRO_cons ;
P4 ACRO_cons ;
Q-2 ACRO_cons ;
S/S ACRO_cons ;
SVT1 ACRO_cons ;
SVT2 ACRO_cons ;
SVT24 ACRO_cons ;
T5PC ACRO_cons ;
TV2 ACRO_cons ;
TV3 ACRO_cons ;
TV4 ACRO_cons ;
U-19 ACRO_cons ;
U-23 ACRO_cons ;
U19 ACRO_cons ;
U23 ACRO_cons ;
UTF-8 ACRO_cons ;
UU2 ACRO_cons ;
Vg3 ACRO_cons ;
XLV54%0 ACRO_cons ;
V-8%0%0 ACRO_cons ;
8%0%0R ACRO_cons ;
LEXICON SOMELONGACRO		!^C^
EXFACFON ACRO_cons ;
EXFACHS ACRO_cons ; 
mánáid-TV ACRO_cons ;
mánáj-TV ACRO_cons ;
tæksta-TV ACRO_cons ;
AB ACRO_cons ;
ABC ACRO_cons ;
ACTA ACRO_cons ;
AD ACRO_cons ;
ADHD ACRO_cons ;
ADSL ACRO_cons ;
AFS ACRO_cons ;
AIDS ACRO_cons ;
AL ACRO_cons ;
AMT ACRO_cons ;
AN ACRO_cons ;
ANC ACRO_cons ;
ANS ACRO_cons ;
AP ACRO_cons ;
APTN ACRO_cons ;
AR ACRO_cons ;
ARN ACRO_cons ;
AS ACRO_cons ;
ASA ACRO_vow ;
ASS ACRO_cons ;
ASVO ACRO_cons ;
AT ACRO_cons ;
ATSIC ACRO_cons ;
ATV ACRO_cons ;
AU ACRO_cons ;
AUF ACRO_cons ;
AV ACRO_cons ;
AWG ACRO_cons ;
AYC ACRO_cons ;
AÁF ACRO_cons ;
BA ACRO_cons ;
BASIC ACRO_cons ; 
BB ACRO_cons ;
BBC ACRO_cons ;
BBL ACRO_cons ;
BD ACRO_cons ;
BDF ACRO_cons ;
BES ACRO_cons ;
BHD ACRO_cons ;
BI ACRO_cons ;
BIBSYS ACRO_cons ;
BK ACRO_cons ;
BMB ACRO_cons ;
BNB ACRO_cons ;
BNO ACRO_cons ;
BOF ACRO_cons ;
BOL ACRO_cons ;
BONO ACRO_cons ;
BPA ACRO_cons ;
BSS ACRO_cons ;
BST ACRO_cons ;
BT ACRO_cons ;
BU ACRO_cons ;
BUL ACRO_cons ;
BUORIT ACRO_cons ;
BUP ACRO_cons ;
CBS ACRO_cons ;
CC ACRO_cons ;
CCITT ACRO_cons ;
CD ACRO_cons ;
CERD ACRO_cons ;
CIA ACRO_cons ;
CNN ACRO_cons ;
CNN ACRO_cons ;
CO ACRO_cons ;
CO2 ACRO_cons ;
COCOM ACRO_cons ;
COMECON ACRO_cons ;
COOP ACRO_cons ;
CPJ ACRO_cons ;
CV ACRO_cons ;
DA ACRO_cons ;
DAB ACRO_cons ;
DAN ACRO_cons ;
DAT ACRO_cons ;
DBE ACRO_cons ;
DD ACRO_cons ;
DE ACRO_cons ;
DES ACRO_cons ;
DFD ACRO_cons ;
DGT ACRO_cons ;
DILLI ACRO_vow ;
DIR ACRO_cons ;
DJ ACRO_cons ;
DKS ACRO_cons ;
DL ACRO_cons ;
DN ACRO_cons ;
DNA ACRO_cons ;
DON ACRO_cons ;
DS ACRO_cons ;
DSF ACRO_cons ;
DSJ ACRO_cons ;
DT ACRO_cons ;
DVD ACRO_cons ;
DÁL ACRO_cons ;
ECA ACRO_cons ;
ED ACRO_cons ;
EEK ACRO_cons ;
EES ACRO_cons ;
EFTA ACRO_cons ;
EGD ACRO_cons ;
EM ACRO_cons ;
EMRIP ACRO_cons ;
ENA ACRO_vow ;
EO ACRO_cons ;
ER ACRO_cons ;
ESA ACRO_vow ;
ETA ACRO_vow ;
ETS ACRO_cons ;
EZLN ACRO_cons ;
EØS ACRO_cons ;
FAB ACRO_cons ;
FAO ACRO_cons ;
FC ACRO_cons ;
FE ACRO_cons ;
FFF ACRO_cons ;
FGDL ACRO_cons ;
FIM ACRO_cons ;
FK ACRO_cons ;
FLS ACRO_cons ;
FMX ACRO_cons ;
FNUC ACRO_cons ;
FORTRAN ACRO_cons ;
FS ACRO_cons ;
FUG ACRO_cons ;
FÁGA ACRO_vow ;
GB ACRO_cons ;
GDL ACRO_cons ;
GGD ACRO_cons ;
GII ACRO_cons ;
GJSL ACRO_cons ;
GL ACRO_cons ;
GO ACRO_cons ;
GP ACRO_cons ;
GS ACRO_cons ;
GSM ACRO_cons ;
HB ACRO_cons ;
HE ACRO_cons ;
HFK ACRO_cons ;
HK ACRO_cons ;
HRW ACRO_cons ;
HV ACRO_cons ;
IBK ACRO_cons ;
ICC ACRO_cons ;
ID ACRO_cons ;
IFU ACRO_vow ;
II ACRO_cons ;
IIIA ACRO_vow ;
IKO ACRO_vow ;
IKT ACRO_cons ;
ILAR ACRO_cons ;
ILO ACRO_vow ;
ILO ACRO_vow ;
ILUS ACRO_cons ;
IN ACRO_cons ;
INTERREG+Err/Orth:INTERREG ACRO_cons ; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
IPS ACRO_cons ;
IRE ACRO_cons ;
ISAN ACRO_cons ;
ISDN ACRO_cons ;
IV ACRO_cons ;
IWGIA ACRO_cons ;
JB ACRO_cons ;
JK ACRO_cons ;
JOD ACRO_cons ;
JPG ACRO_cons ;
JSL ACRO_cons ;
JUO ACRO_vow ;
KAB ACRO_cons ;
KD ACRO_cons ;
KFK ACRO_cons ;
KIBK ACRO_cons ;
KISP ACRO_cons ;
KJSS ACRO_cons ;
KLM ACRO_cons ;
KM ACRO_cons ;
KPK ACRO_cons ;
KRD ACRO_cons ;
KS ACRO_cons ;
KSS ACRO_cons ;
KUF ACRO_cons ;
LD ACRO_cons ;
LEA ACRO_vow ;
LHL ACRO_cons ;
LLH ACRO_cons ;
LMS ACRO_cons ;
LOBI ACRO_cons ;
LU ACRO_cons ;
MB ACRO_cons ;
MBL ACRO_cons ;
MD ACRO_cons ;
MEGA ACRO_vow ;
aktan.no ACRO_vow ;
NSU ACRO_cons ;
LTI ACRO_cons ;
IZH ACRO_cons ;
GM ACRO_cons ;
ERF ACRO_cons ;
AEC ACRO_cons ;
ET ACRO_cons ;
RE ACRO_cons ;
MGP ACRO_cons ;
MIEHTÁ ACRO_vow ;
MIELDE ACRO_vow ;
ML ACRO_cons ;
MMI ACRO_cons ;
MNP ACRO_cons ;
MS ACRO_cons ;
MUHTO ACRO_cons ;
MW ACRO_cons ;
MÁ ACRO_cons ;
NAF ACRO_cons ;
NASCO ACRO_vow ;
NAVO ACRO_cons ; 
NB ACRO_cons ;
NCS ACRO_cons ;
NGO ACRO_cons ;
NHO ACRO_cons ;
NIF ACRO_cons ;
NINA ACRO_cons ;
NINA-NIKU ACRO_vow ;
NJ ACRO_cons ;
NKK ACRO_cons ;
NLS ACRO_cons ;
NMK ACRO_cons ;
NN ACRO_cons ;
NOK ACRO_cons ;
NOPA ACRO_vow ;
SAMINOR ACRO_cons ;
NORUT ACRO_cons ; 
NOU ACRO_cons ;
NRK3 ACRO_cons ;
NSB ACRO_cons ;
NSI ACRO_cons ;
NSR-N ACRO_cons ;
NTL ACRO_cons ;
NU ACRO_cons ;
NÁČ ACRO_cons ;
NuorajTV+Err/Orth:Nuoraj-tv ACRO_cons ;
NuorajTV ACRO_cons ;
OAS ACRO_cons ;
OB ACRO_cons ;
ODD ACRO_cons ;
OG ACRO_cons ;
OHCAN ACRO_cons ;
OIPA ACRO_vow ;
OL ACRO_cons ;
OLU ACRO_vow ;
ORO ACRO_vow ;
OS ACRO_cons ;
OSS ACRO_cons ;
OVDAL ACRO_cons ;
PC ACRO_cons ;
PETA ACRO_cons ;
PFL ACRO_cons ;
PIL ACRO_cons ;
PIPE ACRO_vow ;
PM ACRO_cons ;
PPB ACRO_cons ;
PPT ACRO_cons ;
PS ACRO_cons ;
RAF ACRO_cons ;
RBK ACRO_cons ;
RD ACRO_cons ;
REMA+Err/Orth:REMA ACRO_cons ; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
RMS ACRO_cons ;
RO ACRO_cons ;
RPU ACRO_vow ;
RS ACRO_cons ;
RSFSR ACRO_cons ;
RSS ACRO_cons ;
RV ACRO_cons ;
SAFE ACRO_cons ;
SÁNAG ACRO_cons ;
SAP ACRO_cons ;
SATØ ACRO_cons ;
SAÁO ACRO_vow ;
SBB ACRO_cons ;
SBSS ACRO_cons ;
SCPAR ACRO_cons ;
SDD ACRO_cons ;
SDGB ACRO_cons ;
SDS ACRO_cons ;
SEFO ACRO_cons ;
SEK ACRO_cons ;
SF ACRO_cons ;
SFF ACRO_cons ;
SFR ACRO_cons ;
SFT ACRO_cons ;
SGL ACRO_cons ;
SGR ACRO_cons ;
SGS ACRO_cons ;
SIFI ACRO_cons ;
SISA ACRO_vow ;
SIVA ACRO_vow ;
SJS ACRO_cons ;
SKES ACRO_cons ;
SKR ACRO_cons ;
SKUP ACRO_cons ;
SLF ACRO_cons ;
SM ACRO_cons ;
SMS ACRO_cons ;
SND ACRO_cons ;
SNJ ACRO_cons ;
SNPL ACRO_cons ;
SOD ACRO_cons ;
SOG ACRO_cons ;
SOL ACRO_cons ;
SOS ACRO_cons ;
SP ACRO_cons ;
SPR ACRO_cons ;
SRJ ACRO_cons ;
SS ACRO_cons ;
SSB ACRO_cons ;
SSG ACRO_cons ;
SSN ACRO_cons ;
SSR ACRO_cons ;
SSSR ACRO_cons ;
SU ACRO_cons ;
SUFUR ACRO_cons ;
SUPU ACRO_vow ;
SV ACRO_cons ;
SVF ACRO_cons ;
SVL-N ACRO_cons ;
SVT ACRO_cons ;
SÁB ACRO_cons ;
SÁLAS ACRO_cons ; 
SÅG ACRO_cons ;
TCO ACRO_cons ;
TIL ACRO_cons ;
TONO ACRO_cons ;
TSI ACRO_cons ;
TV ACRO_cons ;
UD ACRO_cons ;
UDSL ACRO_cons ;
UEW ACRO_cons ;
UN ACRO_cons ;
UNEP ACRO_cons ;
UNG ACRO_cons ;
UNIKOM ACRO_cons ; 
UNTAK ACRO_cons ;
URACCAN ACRO_cons ;
USA ACRO_cons ;
VBL ACRO_cons ;
VI ACRO_cons ;
VIII ACRO_cons ;
VOX ACRO_cons ;
VS ACRO_cons ;
VVS ACRO_cons ;
WC ACRO_cons ;
WHO ACRO_cons ;
WRH ACRO_cons ;
WWA ACRO_cons ;
WWM ACRO_cons ;
YEH ACRO_cons ;
YSS ACRO_cons ;
ÁLGU ACRO_cons ; 
ÅT ACRO_cons ;
LEXICON smallacro
Aa ACRO_cons ;
Brokkoli% MT ACRO_cons ;
dvd ACRO_cons ;
Radisson-SAS ACRO_cons ;
SMSAm ACRO_cons ;
tv ACRO_cons ;
AciA ACRO_vow ;
AiS ACRO_cons ;
Bb ACRO_cons ;
BfS ACRO_cons ;
DnB ACRO_cons ;
DuÅ ACRO_cons ;
EtMk ACRO_cons ;
FeFo ACRO_cons ;
Flf ACRO_cons ;
FrP ACRO_cons ;
FrS ACRO_cons ;
Ger ACRO_cons ;
HadCM ACRO_cons ;
ImO ACRO_vow ;
Jd ACRO_cons ;
K-ent+Err/Orth:K-ent ACRO_cons ;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
KBb ACRO_cons ;
KoKo ACRO_vow ;
KoKS ACRO_cons ;
KrF ACRO_cons ;
KrÁ ACRO_cons ;
KáB ACRO_cons ;
LaW ACRO_cons ;
LuW ACRO_cons ;
MiF ACRO_cons ;
NgL ACRO_cons ;
Norfu+Err/Orth:Norfu ACRO_cons ;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
pc ACRO_cons ;
PhD ACRO_cons ;
RiTø+Err/Orth:Ri^Tø ACRO_cons ;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
Rp ACRO_cons ;
SamS ACRO_cons ;
Sf ACRO_cons ;
SfF ACRO_cons ;
SkL ACRO_cons ;
SUKPb ACRO_cons ;
SVL-Fi ACRO_cons ;
UiB ACRO_cons ;
UiT ACRO_cons ;
wc ACRO_cons ;
